Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Casualty and Surety
InsuranceContracts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 667 to 726; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1524 to 1536.

45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 690 to 695; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 940 to 1026, 1230, 1231, 1125 to 1167; 46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1301 to 1315.

§ 26-23-201.
Casualty and surety contracts subject to provisions of code.

The following insurance contracts covering subjects of insurance resident, located or to be performed in this state are subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 15 and to other applicable provisions of this code [title 26]:

Casualty insurance contracts; and

Surety insurance contracts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 453, 459; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-453, 26.1-459; W.S. 1977, §§

26-22-101

,

26-27-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “surety insurance,” see §

26-5-105

.

For definition of “casualty insurance,” see §

26-5-106

.

As to rates of casualty and surety insurance, see §

26-14-105

.

As to rate filings of casualty and surety insurance, see §

26-14-107

.

As to sureties generally, see title 38.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Stated

in

State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurance carrier's liability for part of employer's liability attributable to violation of law or other misconduct on his part, 1 ALR2d 407.

Provisions of policy respecting location of personal property covered by it, 4 ALR2d 868.

Construction and application of provision of insurance policy excepting from coverage loss or damage caused by dishonesty of employee, 12 ALR2d 236.

Conflict of laws as to right of injured person to maintain direct action against tortfeasor's automobile liability insurer, 16 ALR2d 881.

Losses among automobile liability insurers under policies containing pro rata clauses, 21 ALR2d 611.

Scope of clause of insurance policy covering injuries sustained from being “accidentally thrown from” a vehicle, 24 ALR2d 1454.

Failure to give notice or other lack of cooperation by insured as defense to action against compulsory liability insurer by injured member of the public, 31 ALR2d 645.

Revival of theft provision of insurance policy suspended for breach of condition or warranty, 31 ALR2d 849.

Misrepresentation by applicant for automobile liability insurance as to ownership of vehicle as material to risk, 33 ALR2d 948.

Coverage of policy insuring motor carrier against liability for loss of or damage to shipped property, 36 ALR2d 506.

Insured's release of tortfeasor before settlement by insurer as releasing insurer from liability, 38 ALR2d 1095.

Duty of liability insurer to settle or compromise, 40 ALR2d 168, 63 ALR3d 627, 63 ALR3d 725.

Refusal of liability insurer to defend action against insured involving both claims within coverage of policy and claims not covered, 41 ALR2d 434.

Coverage of medical payments and funeral expenses clauses of liability policy, 42 ALR2d 983.

Measure of recovery by insured under automobile collision insurance policy, 43 ALR2d 327.

Construction and effect of clause in vehicle insurance policy requiring insured, when loss occurs, to protect vehicle, 44 ALR2d 1081.

Liability between automobile liability insurers one or more of whose policies provide against any liability if there is other insurance, 46 ALR2d 1163.

Repeated absorption of poisonous substance as “accident” within coverage clause of comprehensive general liability policy, 49 ALR2d 1263.

Allegations in third person's action against insured as determining liability insurer's duty to defend, 50 ALR2d 458.

Insurer's previous custom in giving notice of due date of premiums as affecting its right to declare liability policy forfeited or canceled for failure to pay premiums, 52 ALR2d 1157.

What loss of or damage to vehicle is accidental within coverage of collision policy, 57 ALR2d 1229.

Limitation of action against liability insurer for failure to settle claim or action against insured, 68 ALR2d 892.

Duty of liability insurer to appeal, 69 ALR2d 690.

Liability between liability insurers each of whose policies provides that it shall be “excess” insurance, 69 ALR2d 1122.

Basis and manner of distribution among multiple claimants of proceeds of liability insurance policy inadequate to pay all claims in full, 70 ALR2d 416.

Sole, unconditional or absolute ownership clause in liability insurance, 71 ALR2d 267.

Liability insurer's liability for interest and costs on excess of judgment over policy limit, 76 ALR2d 983.

Coverage and exceptions in beauty shop liability policy, 77 ALR2d 1258.

Rights and liabilities under “uninsured motorists” coverage, 79 ALR2d 1252.

Scope and purview of clause excluding business property from coverage of policy insuring unschedule personal property, 80 ALR2d 1289.

Exclusionary provision of motor vehicle insurance relating to age of operator, 83 ALR2d 1236.

Materiality of false statements by applicant for automobile insurance as to license revocations or suspensions or traffic violations, 89 ALR2d 1027.

Liability insurance of garages, motor vehicle repair shops and sales agencies, and the like, 93 ALR2d 1047.

Builders' risk insurance policies, 94 ALR2d 221.

Injury from nuisance maintained by insured as within coverage of public liability policy, 98 ALR2d 1047.

Provisions of burglary or theft policy as to visible marks or visible evidence, 99 ALR2d 129.

Reformation of automobile liability insurance policy by adding to or substituting for the named insured the person intended to be insured, 1 ALR3d 885.

Insurable interest for purposes of liability insurance, 1 ALR3d 1193.

Coverage of insurance policy against theft of property from motor vehicle, 2 ALR3d 809.

Specific exclusion of liability for injury intentionally caused by insured, 2 ALR3d 1238, 35 ALR4th 1063.

Omnibus clause of automobile liability policy as covering accidents caused by third person who is using car with consent of permittee of named insured, 4 ALR3d 10.

Liability insurance policy as covering insured's obligation to indemnify or make contributions to cotortfeasor, 4 ALR3d 620.

“Accident” or “accidental” under liability insurance as including loss resulting from ordinary negligence of insured or his agent, 7 ALR3d 1262.

Farmer's comprehensive personal liability insurance, 8 ALR3d 916.

Scope of provision of automobile liability insurance policy excluding liability for damage to property in charge of insured or variation of such provision, 10 ALR3d 515.

Right of tortfeasor or liability insurer to credit for amounts already disbursed to injured party under medical payments or funeral expense clause in liability policy, 11 ALR3d 1115.

Provisions of burglary or theft policy as to effect of disappearance of property, 12 ALR3d 865.

Assignability of insured's right to recover over against liability insurer for rejection of settlement offer, 12 ALR3d 1158.

Temporary automobile insurance pending issuance of policy, 12 ALR3d 1304.

Construction and application of provision in liability policy limiting the amount of insurer's liability to one person, 13 ALR3d 1228.

Temporary fire, wind or hail insurance pending issuance of policy, 14 ALR3d 568.

Coverage of policy insuring against liability under dramshop acts, 14 ALR3d 858.

Automobile liability insurance policy as covering in the absence of specific exclusion personal injury or death of or loss sustained by named or additional insured, 15 ALR3d 711.

Liability insurer's rights and duties as to defense and settlement as affected by its having issued policies covering parties who have conflicting interests, 18 ALR3d 482.

Person directing movement of motor vehicle from outside the vehicle as within clause extending coverage to person using the insured vehicle, 18 ALR3d 814.

Subrogation rights of insurer under medical payments provision of automobile insurance policy, 19 ALR3d 1054.

Liability insurance as covering accident, damage or injury due to wanton or willful misconduct or gross negligence, 20 ALR3d 320.

Limits of amount of medical insurance coverage under insurance policy covering more than one vehicle, 21 ALR3d 900.

Provisions of burglary or theft policy requiring “physical damage to premises” in connection with losses, 22 ALR3d 1305.

Coverage under premises liability insurance of injury sustained on or in connection with sidewalks or ways adjacent to certain property, 23 ALR3d 1230.

Construction of clause excluding injury or damage caused by race, speed test or the like, 23 ALR3d 1444.

Effect of advance payment by tortfeasor's liability insurer to injured claimant, 25 ALR3d 1091.

What constitutes an “uninsured” or “unknown” vehicle or motorist within uninsured motorist coverage, 26 ALR3d 883.

Liability insurer's right to open or set aside or to contest matters relating to merits of judgment against insured entered in action in which insurer did not appear or defend, 27 ALR3d 350.

Insured's misrepresentation or misstatement as to his name or marital status as ground for avoiding liability insurance, 27 ALR3d 849.

Validity, construction and effect of provision in shipping contract or bill of lading that carrier shall have benefit of shipper's insurance against loss of or damage to shipment, 27 ALR3d 984.

Liability insurer's duty to defend action against an insured after insurer's full performance of its payment obligations under policy, 27 ALR3d 1057.

Time limitations as to claims based on uninsured motorist clause, 28 ALR3d 580.

Validity and construction of liability policy provision requiring insured to reimburse insurer for payments made under policy, 29 ALR3d 291.

Representations as to age or identity of persons who will drive vehicle or as to extent of their relative use as ground for avoiding coverage under automobile insurance policy, 29 ALR3d 1139.

Coverage of automobile insurance as extending beyond death of named insured, 30 ALR3d 1047.

Construction of medical payments insurance provision in automobile insurance covering injuries incurred when “struck by” automobile, 33 ALR3d 962.

Potential liability of insurer under liability policy as subject of attachment, 33 ALR3d 992.

Recoverability under property damage liability insurance of insured's expenses to prevent or mitigate damages, 33 ALR3d 1262.

Remedies and measure of damages for wrongful cancellation of liability insurance, 34 ALR3d 385.

Liability insurer's negligence or bad faith in conducting defense as ground of liability to insured, 34 ALR3d 533.

Construction and application of provision of liability policy, other than automobile liability, excluding from coverage injury or death of employee of insured, 34 ALR3d 1397.

Limitation of amount of coverage under automobile liability policy as affected by fact that policy covers more than one vehicle, 37 ALR3d 1263.

Construction of provision of liability insurance policy excluding injuries in connection with “structural alteration” of premises, 37 ALR3d 1421.

Trivial nature of personal injury as excusing compliance with liability insurance policy provision requiring notice to insurer, 39 ALR3d 593.

Who is “executive officer” of insured within coverage of liability insurance policy, 39 ALR3d 1434.

Liability insurer's unconditional right to cancel policy as affected by considerations of public policy, 40 ALR3d 1439.

Homeowners' or personal liability insurance as providing coverage for liability under workmen's compensation laws, 41 ALR3d 1306.

Motor scooter as within policy provisions relating to automobiles or motorcycles, 43 ALR3d 1400.

Coverage of expense of reward offered by insured or other expense incurred in recovering stolen property, 46 ALR3d 403.

What constitutes “actual trial” under policy provision conditioning liability insurer's obligation upon determination of insured's liability by judgment after actual trial, 48 ALR3d 1082.

Subrogation of employer's liability insurer to employer's right of indemnity against negligent employee, 53 ALR3d 631.

Construction and application of clause excluding from coverage of liability policy “completed operations hazards,” 58 ALR3d 12.

Right of injured persons recovering excess judgment against insured to maintain action against liability insurer for wrongful failure to settle claim, 63 ALR3d 677.

What constitutes a “vehicle” or “land vehicle” within meaning of insurance policy provision defining risks covered or excepted, 65 ALR3d 824.

Coverage and exclusions under hospital professional liability or indemnity policy, 65 ALR3d 969.

What constitutes “commercial automobile” within exclusion from death or disability benefit provided by automobile policy, 66 ALR3d 424.

Motorcycle as within automobile liability policy provision covering temporary or infrequent use of other automobiles, 66 ALR3d 451.

What constitutes “money” within coverage or exclusion of theft or other crime policy, 68 ALR3d 1179.

Liability of automobile collision insurer undertaking to repair damaged vehicle for negligence or delay in making repairs, 68 ALR3d 1196.

No-fault: right of insurer to reimbursement out of recovery against tortfeasor, 69 ALR3d 830.

Construction of provision of aviation liability policy which requires pilot of insured aircraft to have appropriate license or certification, 72 ALR3d 525.

Concealment or nondisclosure of physical defects or conditions as grounds for avoiding coverage, 72 ALR3d 804.

Coverage under uninsured motorist clause of injury inflicted intentionally, 72 ALR3d 1161.

Liability of air carrier for damage or injury sustained by passenger as result of hijacking, 72 ALR3d 1299.

Insured's right to bring direct action against insurer for uninsured motorist benefits, 73 ALR3d 632.

Extraterritorial application of statute permitting injured person to maintain direct action against tortfeasor's automobile liability insurer, 83 ALR3d 338.

Construction and application of liability or indemnity policy on civil engineer, architect, or the like, 83 ALR3d 539.

Lawyers' professional liability insurance, 84 ALR3d 187.

Who is “resident” or “member” of same “household” or “family” as named insured, within liability insurance provision defining additional insureds, 93 ALR3d 420.

Risks within “loading and unloading” clause of motor vehicle liability insurance policy, 6 ALR4th 686.

Scope of clause excluding from contractor's or similar liability policy damage to property in care, custody or control of insured, 8 ALR4th 563.

Construction, application and effect of clause that liability insurance policy may be canceled by insured by mailing to insurer written notice stating when thereafter such cancellation shall be effective, 11 ALR4th 456.

Liability insurance coverage as extending to liability for punitive or exemplary damages, 16 ALR4th 11.

Right of mortgagee, who acquires title to mortgaged premises in satisfaction of motorgage, to recover, under fire insurance policy covering him as “mortgagee,” for loss or injury to property thereafter damaged or destroyed by fire, 19 ALR4th 778.

Construction and effect of provision of homeowner's premises, or personal liability policy covering or excluding watercraft, 26 ALR4th 967.

Combining or “stacking” medical payment provisions of automobile liability policy or policies issued by one or more insurers to one insured, 29 ALR4th 49.

Automobile, fire, theft and collision insurance: insurable interest in stolen motor vehicle, 38 ALR4th 538.

Cancellation of compulsory or “financial responsibility” automobile insurance, 44 ALR4th 13.

Liability insurance: when is vehicle in “dead storage,” 48 ALR4th 591.

Aviation insurance: causal link between breach of policy provisions and accident as requisite to avoid insurer's liability, 48 ALR4th 778.

Who is “employed or engaged in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 55 ALR4th 261.

Insured-insurer communications as privileged, 55 ALR4th 336.

What constitutes use of vehicle “in the automobile business” within exclusionary clause of liability policy, 56 ALR4th 300.

What constitutes “entering” or “alighting from” vehicle within meaning of insurance policy, or statute mandating insurance coverage, 59 ALR4th 149.

Liability insurance: what is “claim” under deductibility-per-claim clause, 60 ALR4th 983.

What constitutes single accident or occurrence within liability policy limiting insurer's liability to a specified amount per accident or occurrence, 64 ALR4th 668.

What constitutes “motor vehicle” for purposes of no-fault insurance, 73 ALR4th 1053.

Loss of information stored in computer system or on computer disk cartridge, computer tape or similar computer storage media as within coverage of liability policy, 85 ALR4th 1102.

Fire Insurance: Failure to disclose prior fires affecting insured's property as ground for avoidance of policy, 4 ALR5th 117.

Air carrier's liability for injury from condition of airport premises, 14 ALR5th 662.

Event triggering liability insurance coverage as occurring within period of time covered by liability insurance policy where injury or damage is delayed—modern cases, 14 ALR5th 695.

Construction and application of “business pursuits” exclusion provision in general liability policy, 35 ALR5th 375.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

Duty of liability insurer to initiate settlement negotiations, 51 ALR5th 701.